Florida, session 2026, SB1140.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 53 54 Section 1.âPresent subsections (3) through (12) of section 55 394.4615, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) 56 through (13), respectively, a new subsection (3) is added to 57 that section, and paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (2) 58 of that section are republished, to read: 59 394.4615âClinical records; confidentiality.â 60 (2)âThe clinical record shall be released when: 61 (a)âThe patient or the patientâs guardian or legal 62 custodian authorizes the release. The guardian, guardian 63 advocate, or legal custodian shall be provided access to the 64 appropriate clinical records of the patient. The patient or the 65 patientâs guardian, guardian advocate, or legal custodian may 66 authorize the release of information and clinical records to 67 appropriate persons to ensure the continuity of the patientâs 68 health care or mental health care. A receiving facility must 69 document that, within 24 hours of admission, individuals 70 admitted on a voluntary basis have been provided with the option 71 to authorize the release of information from their clinical 72 record to the individualâs health care surrogate or proxy, 73 attorney, representative, or other known emergency contact. 74 (b)âThe patient is represented by counsel and the records 75 are needed by the patientâs counsel for adequate representation. 76 (c)âThe court orders such release. In determining whether 77 there is good cause for disclosure, the court shall weigh the 78 need for the information to be disclosed against the possible 79 harm of disclosure to the person to whom such information 80 pertains. 81 (3)âFor requests made in writing and pursuant to paragraph 82 (2)(a), paragraph (2)(b), or paragraph (2)(c), a service 83 provider shall furnish the requested clinical records in 84 accordance with all of the following requirements: 85 (a)âAs specified in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(a), the patient or 86 his or her legal representative must be given the opportunity to 87 inspect and obtain a copy of the patientâs protected health 88 information in a designated record set, as defined in and s. 89 408.833 and 45 C.F.R. s. 164.501. 90 (b)âAs specified in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(b)(2), the records 91 must be furnished within 30 calendar days after the request is 92 received. 93 (c)âThe protected health information must be provided in 94 the form and format requested, if readily producible, including 95 electronic form if maintained electronically; otherwise, it must 96 be provided in a mutually agreeable readable form and format as 97 required under 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(2). 98 (d)âAs provided in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(4), the provider 99 may impose a reasonable, cost-based fee that may only include 100 coverage of the following costs: 101 1.âLabor for copying the protected health information, 102 whether in paper or electronic form. 103 2.âSupplies for creating the copy, including electronic 104 media if the individual requested the electronic copy be 105 provided on portable media. 106 3.âPostage, if the copy or the summary under subparagraph 107 4. is mailed. 108 4.âPreparation of a summary or explanation of the protected 109 health information, if agreed to in advance. 110 (e)âThe fees for electronic copies of protected health 111 information are limited to $6.50 per request, inclusive of 112 labor, supplies, and postage costs in accordance with 45 C.F.R. 113 s. 164.524(c)(4). Per-page fees are prohibited for electronic 114 records and may apply when protected health information is 115 maintained exclusively on paper and remains in that form, in 116 which case the per-page fee may not exceed $1 per page inclusive 117 of labor, supplies, and postage costs. A fee may not be charged 118 for accessing protected health information that is accessed 119 through an electronic patient portal with view and download 120 functionality. Covered entities shall inform the patient or the 121 patientâs legal representative in advance of the estimated fee 122 and may provide a publicly available fee schedule. Fees may not 123 be charged for administrative or outsourcing costs. 124 125 In accordance with 45 C.F.R. ss. 160.202 and 160.203, to the 126 extent that this section provides greater rights for free access 127 to patient records or imposes lower fees for gaining such access 128 than those provided pursuant to federal laws or regulations, 129 this section supersedes those federal laws and regulations, but 130 only to that extent. 131 Section 2.âSubsections (1), (2), and (3), paragraph (e) of 132 subsection (4), paragraph (a) of subsection (7), and subsection 133 (8) of section 395.3025, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 134 395.3025âPatient and personnel records; copies; 135 examination.â 136 (1)âFor requests made in writing, a licensed facility must 137 furnish the requested patient records in accordance with all of 138 the following requirements: 139 (a)âAs specified in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(a), the patient or 140 his or her legal representative must be given the opportunity to 141 inspect and obtain a copy of the patientâs protected health 142 information in a designated record set, as defined in s. 408.833 143 and 45 C.F.R. s. 164.501. 144 (b)âAs specified in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(b)(2), the records 145 must be furnished within 30 calendar days after the request is 146 received. 147 (c)âThe protected health information must be provided in 148 the form and format requested, if readily producible, including 149 electronic form if maintained electronically; otherwise, it must 150 be provided in a mutually agreeable readable form and format as 151 required under 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(2). 152 (d)âAs provided in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(4), the licensed 153 facility may impose a reasonable, cost-based fee that may only 154 include coverage of the following costs: 155 1.âLabor for copying the protected health information, 156 whether in paper or electronic form. 157 2.âSupplies for creating the copy, including electronic 158 media if the individual requested the electronic copy be 159 provided on portable media. 160 3.âPostage, if the copy or the summary under subparagraph 161 4. is mailed. 162 4.âPreparation of a summary or explanation of the protected 163 health information, if agreed to in advance. 164 (e)âThe fees for electronic copies of protected health 165 information are limited to $6.50 per request, inclusive of 166 labor, supplies, and postage costs in accordance with 45 C.F.R. 167 s. 164.524(c)(4). Per-page fees are prohibited for electronic 168 records and may apply when protected health information is 169 maintained exclusively on paper and remains in that form, in 170 which case the per-page fee may not exceed $1 per page inclusive 171 of labor, supplies, and postage costs. A fee may not be charged 172 for accessing protected health information that is accessed 173 through an electronic patient portal with view and download 174 functionality. Licensed facilities shall inform the patient or 175 the patientâs legal representative in advance of the estimated 176 fee and may provide a publicly available fee schedule. Licensed 177 facilities may not charge fees for administrative or outsourcing 178 costs. 179 180 In accordance with 45 C.F.R. ss. 160.202 and 160.203, to the 181 extent that this section provides greater rights for free access 182 to patient records or imposes lower fees for gaining such access 183 than those provided pursuant to federal laws or regulations, 184 this section supersedes those federal laws and regulations, but 185 only to that extent Any licensed facility shall, upon written 186 request, and only after discharge of the patient, furnish, in a 187 timely manner, without delays for legal review, to any person 188 admitted therein for care and treatment or treated thereat, or 189 to any such personâs guardian, curator, or personal 190 representative, or in the absence of one of those persons, to 191 the next of kin of a decedent or the parent of a minor, or to 192 anyone designated by such person in writing, a true and correct 193 copy of all patient records, including X rays, and insurance 194 information concerning such person, which records are in the 195 possession of the licensed facility, provided the person 196 requesting such records agrees to pay a charge. The exclusive 197 charge for copies of patient records may include sales tax and 198 actual postage, and, except for nonpaper records that are 199 subject to a charge not to exceed $6.50 $2, may not exceed $1 200 per page. A fee of up to $1 may be charged for each year of 201 records requested. These charges shall apply to all records 202 furnished, whether directly from the facility or from a copy 203 service providing these services on behalf of the facility. 204 However, a patient whose records are copied or searched for the 205 purpose of continuing to receive medical care is not required to 206 pay a charge for copying or for the search. The licensed 207 facility shall further allow any such person to examine the 208 original records in its possession, or microforms or other 209 suitable reproductions of the records, upon such reasonable 210 terms as shall be imposed to assure that the records will not be 211 damaged, destroyed, or altered. 212 (2)âThis section does not apply to records maintained at 213 any licensed facility the primary function of which is to 214 provide psychiatric care to its patients, or to records of 215 treatment for any mental or emotional condition at any other 216 licensed facility which are governed by the provisions of s. 217 394.4615. 218 (3)âThis section does not apply to records of substance 219 abuse impaired persons, which are governed by s. 397.501. 220 (4)âPatient records are confidential and must not be 221 disclosed without the consent of the patient or his or her legal 222 representative, but appropriate disclosure may be made without 223 such consent to: 224 (e)âThe Department of Health agency upon subpoena issued 225 pursuant to s. 456.071, but the records obtained thereby must be 226 used solely for the purpose of the department agency and the 227 appropriate professional board in its investigation, 228 prosecution, and appeal of disciplinary proceedings. If the 229 department agency requests copies of the records, the facility 230 may not shall charge no more than its actual copying costs, 231 including reasonable staff time. The records must be sealed and 232 must not be available to the public pursuant to s. 119.07(1) or 233 any other statute providing access to records, nor may they be 234 available to the public as part of the record of investigation 235 for and prosecution in disciplinary proceedings made available 236 to the public by the department agency or the appropriate 237 regulatory board. However, the department agency must make 238 available, upon written request by a practitioner against whom 239 probable cause has been found, any such records that form the 240 basis of the determination of probable cause. 241 (5)(a)(7)(a)âIf the content of any record of patient 242 treatment is provided under this section, the recipient, if 243 other than the patient or the patientâs representative, may use 244 such information only for the purpose provided and may not 245 further disclose any information to any other person or entity, 246 unless expressly permitted by the written consent of the 247 patient. A general authorization for the release of medical 248 information is not sufficient for this purpose. The content of 249 such patient treatment record is confidential and exempt from 250 the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 251 Constitution. 252 (6)(8)âPatient records at hospitals and ambulatory surgical 253 centers are exempt from disclosure under s. 119.07(1), except as 254 provided by subsections (2) and (3) (1)-(5). 255 Section 3.âPresent subsections (8), (9), and (10) of 256 section 397.501, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 257 subsections (9), (10), and (11), respectively, a new subsection 258 (8) is added to that section, and paragraph (d) of subsection 259 (7) of that section is republished, to read: 260 397.501âRights of individuals.âIndividuals receiving 261 substance abuse services from any service provider are 262 guaranteed protection of the rights specified in this section, 263 unless otherwise expressly provided, and service providers must 264 ensure the protection of such rights. 265 (7)âRIGHT TO CONFIDENTIALITY OF INDIVIDUAL RECORDS.â 266 (d)âAny answer to a request for a disclosure of individual 267 records which is not permissible under this section or under the 268 appropriate federal regulations must be made in a way that will 269 not affirmatively reveal that an identified individual has been, 270 or is being diagnosed or treated for substance abuse. The 271 regulations do not restrict a disclosure that an identified 272 individual is not and has never received services. 273 (8)âRIGHT TO ACCESS INDIVIDUAL RECORDS.â 274 (a)âFor requests made in writing, a service provider must 275 furnish the requested clinical records of an individual in 276 accordance with all of the following requirements: 277 1.âAs specified in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(a), the individual 278 or his or her legal representative must be given the opportunity 279 to inspect and obtain a copy of the individualâs protected 280 health information in a designated record set, as defined in s. 281 408.833 and 45 C.F.R. s. 164.501. 282 2.âAs specified in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(b)(2), the records 283 must be furnished within 30 calendar days after the request is 284 received. 285 3.âThe protected health information must be provided in the 286 form and format requested, if readily producible, including 287 electronic form if maintained electronically; otherwise, it must 288 be provided in a mutually agreeable readable form and format as 289 required under 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(2). 290 4.âAs provided in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(4), the service 291 provider may impose a reasonable, cost-based fee that may only 292 include coverage of the following costs: 293 a.âLabor for copying the protected health information, 294 whether in paper or electronic form. 295 b.âSupplies for creating the copy, including electronic 296 media if the individual requested the electronic copy be 297 provided on portable media. 298 c.âPostage, if the copy or the summary under sub 299 subparagraph d. is mailed. 300 d.âPreparation of a summary or explanation of the protected 301 health information, if agreed to in advance. 302 5.âThe fees for electronic copies of protected health 303 information are limited to $6.50 per request, inclusive of 304 labor, supplies, and postage costs in accordance with 45 C.F.R. 305 s. 164.524(c)(4). Per-page fees are prohibited for electronic 306 records and may apply when protected health information is 307 maintained exclusively on paper and remains in that form, in 308 which case the per-page fee may not exceed $1 per page inclusive 309 of labor, supplies, and postage costs. A fee may not be charged 310 for accessing protected health information that is accessed 311 through an electronic patient portal with view and download 312 functionality. Service providers shall inform the individual or 313 the individualâs legal representative in advance of the 314 estimated fee being imposed and may provide a publicly available 315 fee schedule. Service providers may not charge fees for 316 administrative or outsourcing costs. 317 (b)âWithin 10 business days after receiving such a written 318 request, a service provider must provide access to examine the 319 original records in its possession, or microforms or other 320 suitable reproductions of the records, in accordance with 321 subsection (7). The service provider may impose any reasonable 322 terms necessary to ensure that the records will not be damaged, 323 destroyed, or altered. 324 (c)âIn accordance with 45 C.F.R. ss. 160.202 and 160.203, 325 to the extent that this subsection provides greater rights for 326 free access to clinical records or imposes lower fees for 327 gaining such access than those provided pursuant to federal laws 328 or regulations, the provisions of this subsection supersede 329 those federal laws and regulations, but only to that extent. 330 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 400.145, Florida 331 Statutes, is amended to read: 332 400.145âCopies of records of care and treatment of 333 resident.â 334 (1)âUpon receipt of a written request that complies with 335 the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act 336 of 1996 (HIPAA) and this section, a nursing home facility shall 337 furnish to a competent resident, or to a representative of that 338 resident who is authorized to make requests for the residentâs 339 records under HIPAA or subsection (2), copies of the residentâs 340 paper and electronic records that are in possession of the 341 facility. Such records must include any medical records and 342 records concerning the care and treatment of the resident 343 performed by the facility, except for progress notes and 344 consultation report sections of a psychiatric nature. The 345 facility shall provide a resident with access to the requested 346 records within 24 hours, excluding weekends and holidays, and 347 provide copies of the requested records within 2 business 14 348 working days after receipt of a request relating to a current 349 resident or within 30 business working days after receipt of a 350 request relating to a former resident. 351 Section 5.âSection 408.833, Florida Statutes, is created to 352 read: 353 408.833âClient access to medical records.â 354 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 355 (a)ââClientâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 356 408.803. 357 (b)ââDesignated record set,â consistent with 45 C.F.R. s. 358 164.501, means a group of records, maintained by or for a 359 provider, which includes any of the following: 360 1.âMedical and billing records for a patient. 361 2.âEnrollment, payment, claims adjudication, and case or 362 medical management record systems. 363 3.âAny other record used, in whole or in part, by or for 364 the provider to make decisions about a patientâs care, coverage, 365 or benefits, regardless of whether such records have, in fact, 366 been used to make such decisions about the particular patient 367 requesting access to the records. 368 (c)ââLegal representativeâ means any of the following: 369 1.âA legally recognized guardian of the client. 370 2.âA court-appointed representative of the client. 371 3.âA person designated by the client or by a court of 372 competent jurisdiction to receive copies of the clientâs medical 373 records, care and treatment records, or interdisciplinary 374 records. 375 4.âAn attorney who has been designated by a client to 376 receive copies of the clientâs medical records, care and 377 treatment records, or interdisciplinary records. 378 (d)ââProviderâ means any of the entities listed in s. 379 408.802. 380 (2)(a)âWithin 30 calendar days after receiving a written 381 request from a client or a clientâs legal representative, a 382 provider shall furnish a true and correct copy of the requested 383 records within the designated record set which are in the 384 providerâs possession. 385 (b)âWithin 30 calendar days after receiving a written 386 request from a client or a clientâs legal representative, a 387 provider shall furnish a true and correct copy of additional 388 requested records, including medical records, care and treatment 389 records, and interdisciplinary records, as applicable, which are 390 in the providerâs possession. 391 (c)âWithin 10 business days after receiving a request from 392 a client or a clientâs legal representative, a provider shall 393 provide access to examine the original records in the providerâs 394 possession, or microforms or other suitable reproductions of the 395 records. A provider may impose any reasonable terms necessary to 396 ensure that the records will not be damaged, destroyed, or 397 altered. 398 (3)âThe protected health information must be provided in 399 the form and format requested by the client or clientâs legal 400 representative if the requested records are readily producible 401 in that form and format. If the requested records are not 402 readily producible in the requested form or format, the provider 403 must produce the records in a mutually agreeable readable form 404 as specified in 45 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(2). 405 (4)âThis section does not apply to: 406 (a)âRecords maintained at a licensed facility as defined in 407 s. 395.002, the primary function of which is to provide 408 psychiatric care to its patients, or to records of treatment for 409 any mental or emotional condition at any other licensed facility 410 which are governed by s. 394.4615; 411 (b)âRecords of substance abuse impaired persons which are 412 governed by s. 397.501; or 413 (c)âRecords of a resident of a nursing home facility which 414 are governed by s. 400.145. 415 Section 6.âSubsection (6) of section 456.057, Florida 416 Statutes, is amended to read: 417 456.057âOwnership and control of patient records; report or 418 copies of records to be furnished; disclosure of information.â 419 (6)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 420 1.ââDesignated record set,â consistent with 45 C.F.R. s. 421 164.501, means a group of records, maintained by or for the 422 health care practitioner, which includes any of the following: 423 a.âMedical and billing records for a patient. 424 b.âEnrollment, payment, claims adjudication, and case or 425 medical management record systems. 426 c.âAny other record used, in whole or in part, by or for 427 the provider to make decisions about a patientâs care, coverage, 428 or benefits, regardless of whether such records have, in fact, 429 been used to make such decisions about the particular patient 430 requesting access to the records. 431 2.ââLegal representativeâ means any of the following: 432 a.âA legally recognized guardian of the patient. 433 b.âA court-appointed representative of the patient. 434 c.âA person designated by the patient or by a court of 435 competent jurisdiction to receive copies of the patientâs 436 medical records, care and treatment records, or 437 interdisciplinary records. 438 d.âAn attorney who has been designated by a patient to 439 receive copies of the patientâs medical records, care and 440 treatment records, or interdisciplinary records. 441 (b)1.âWithin 30 calendar days after receiving a written Any 442 health care practitioner licensed by the department or a board 443 within the department who makes a physical or mental examination 444 of, or administers treatment or dispenses legend drugs to, any 445 person shall, upon request from a patient of such person or the 446 patientâs personâs legal representative, a health care 447 practitioner shall furnish a true and correct copy of the 448 requested records within the designated record set which are in 449 the practitionerâs possession. 450 2.âWithin 30 calendar days after receiving a written 451 request from a patient or a patientâs legal representative, a 452 health care practitioner shall furnish a true and correct copy 453 of additional requested records, including medical records, care 454 and treatment records, and interdisciplinary records, as 455 applicable, which are in the practitionerâs possession. 456 3.âWithin 10 business days after receiving a request from a 457 patient or a patientâs legal representative, a health care 458 practitioner shall provide access to examine the original 459 records in the practitionerâs possession, or microforms or other 460 suitable reproductions of the records. A health care 461 practitioner may impose any reasonable terms necessary to ensure 462 that the records will not be damaged, destroyed, or altered. 463 4.âThe protected health information must be provided in the 464 form and format requested by the patient or legal representative 465 if the requested records are readily producible in that form and 466 format. If the requested records are not readily producible in 467 the requested form or format, the practitioner must produce the 468 records in a mutually agreeable readable form as specified in 45 469 C.F.R. s. 164.524(c)(2), in a timely manner, without delays for 470 legal review, copies of all reports and records relating to such 471 examination or treatment, including X rays and insurance 472 information. 473 474 However, when a patientâs psychiatric, chapter 490 475 psychological, or chapter 491 psychotherapeutic records are 476 requested by the patient or the patientâs legal representative, 477 the health care practitioner may provide a report of examination 478 and treatment in lieu of copies of records. Upon a patientâs 479 written request, complete copies of the patientâs psychiatric 480 records shall be provided directly to a subsequent treating 481 psychiatrist. The furnishing of such report or copies may shall 482 not be conditioned upon payment of a fee for services rendered. 483 Section 7.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 484 316.1932, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 485 316.1932âTests for alcohol, chemical substances, or 486 controlled substances; implied consent; refusal.â 487 (1) 488 (f)1.âThe tests determining the weight of alcohol in the 489 defendantâs blood or breath shall be administered at the request 490 of a law enforcement officer substantially in accordance with 491 rules of the Department of Law Enforcement. Such rules must 492 specify precisely the test or tests that are approved by the 493 Department of Law Enforcement for reliability of result and ease 494 of administration, and must provide an approved method of 495 administration which must be followed in all such tests given 496 under this section. However, the failure of a law enforcement 497 officer to request the withdrawal of blood does not affect the 498 admissibility of a test of blood withdrawn for medical purposes. 499 2.a.âOnly a physician, certified paramedic, registered 500 nurse, licensed practical nurse, other personnel authorized by a 501 hospital to draw blood, or duly licensed clinical laboratory 502 director, supervisor, technologist, or technician, acting at the 503 request of a law enforcement officer, may withdraw blood for the 504 purpose of determining its alcoholic content or the presence of 505 chemical substances or controlled substances therein. However, 506 the failure of a law enforcement officer to request the 507 withdrawal of blood does not affect the admissibility of a test 508 of blood withdrawn for medical purposes. 509 b.âNotwithstanding any provision of law pertaining to the 510 confidentiality of hospital records or other medical records, if 511 a health care provider, who is providing medical care in a 512 health care facility to a person injured in a motor vehicle 513 crash, becomes aware, as a result of any blood test performed in 514 the course of that medical treatment, that the personâs blood 515 alcohol level meets or exceeds the blood-alcohol level specified 516 in s. 316.193(1)(b), the health care provider may notify any law 517 enforcement officer or law enforcement agency. Any such notice 518 must be given within a reasonable time after the health care 519 provider receives the test result. Any such notice shall be used 520 only for the purpose of providing the law enforcement officer 521 with reasonable cause to request the withdrawal of a blood 522 sample pursuant to this section. 523 c.âThe notice shall consist only of the name of the person 524 being treated, the name of the person who drew the blood, the 525 blood-alcohol level indicated by the test, and the date and time 526 of the administration of the test. 527 d.âNothing contained in s. 395.3025(2) s. 395.3025(4), s. 528 456.057, or any applicable practice act affects the authority to 529 provide notice under this section, and the health care provider 530 is not considered to have breached any duty owed to the person 531 under s. 395.3025(2) s. 395.3025(4), s. 456.057, or any 532 applicable practice act by providing notice or failing to 533 provide notice. It shall not be a breach of any ethical, moral, 534 or legal duty for a health care provider to provide notice or 535 fail to provide notice. 536 e.âA civil, criminal, or administrative action may not be 537 brought against any person or health care provider participating 538 in good faith in the provision of notice or failure to provide 539 notice as provided in this section. Any person or health care 540 provider participating in the provision of notice or failure to 541 provide notice as provided in this section shall be immune from 542 any civil or criminal liability and from any professional 543 disciplinary action with respect to the provision of notice or 544 failure to provide notice under this section. Any such 545 participant has the same immunity with respect to participating 546 in any judicial proceedings resulting from the notice or failure 547 to provide notice. 548 3.âThe person tested may, at his or her own expense, have a 549 physician, registered nurse, other personnel authorized by a 550 hospital to draw blood, or duly licensed clinical laboratory 551 director, supervisor, technologist, or technician, or other 552 person of his or her own choosing administer an independent test 553 in addition to the test administered at the direction of the law 554 enforcement officer for the purpose of determining the amount of 555 alcohol in the personâs blood or breath or the presence of 556 chemical substances or controlled substances at the time 557 alleged, as shown by chemical analysis of his or her blood or 558 urine, or by chemical or physical test of his or her breath. The 559 failure or inability to obtain an independent test by a person 560 does not preclude the admissibility in evidence of the test 561 taken at the direction of the law enforcement officer. The law 562 enforcement officer shall not interfere with the personâs 563 opportunity to obtain the independent test and shall provide the 564 person with timely telephone access to secure the test, but the 565 burden is on the person to arrange and secure the test at the 566 personâs own expense. 567 4.âUpon the request of the person tested, full information 568 concerning the results of the test taken at the direction of the 569 law enforcement officer shall be made available to the person or 570 his or her attorney. Full information is limited to the 571 following: 572 a.âThe type of test administered and the procedures 573 followed. 574 b.âThe time of the collection of the blood or breath sample 575 analyzed. 576 c.âThe numerical results of the test indicating the alcohol 577 content of the blood and breath. 578 d.âThe type and status of any permit issued by the 579 Department of Law Enforcement which was held by the person who 580 performed the test. 581 e.âIf the test was administered by means of a breath 582 testing instrument, the date of performance of the most recent 583 required inspection of such instrument. 584 585 Full information does not include manuals, schematics, or 586 software of the instrument used to test the person or any other 587 material that is not in the actual possession of the state. 588 Additionally, full information does not include information in 589 the possession of the manufacturer of the test instrument. 590 5.âA hospital, clinical laboratory, medical clinic, or 591 similar medical institution or physician, certified paramedic, 592 registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, other personnel 593 authorized by a hospital to draw blood, or duly licensed 594 clinical laboratory director, supervisor, technologist, or 595 technician, or other person assisting a law enforcement officer 596 does not incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of 597 the withdrawal or analysis of a blood or urine specimen, or the 598 chemical or physical test of a personâs breath pursuant to 599 accepted medical standards when requested by a law enforcement 600 officer, regardless of whether or not the subject resisted 601 administration of the test. 602 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 603 316.1933, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 604 316.1933âBlood test for impairment or intoxication in cases 605 of death or serious bodily injury; right to use reasonable 606 force.â 607 (2)(a)âOnly a physician, certified paramedic, registered 608 nurse, licensed practical nurse, other personnel authorized by a 609 hospital to draw blood, or duly licensed clinical laboratory 610 director, supervisor, technologist, or technician, acting at the 611 request of a law enforcement officer, may withdraw blood for the 612 purpose of determining the alcoholic content thereof or the 613 presence of chemical substances or controlled substances 614 therein. However, the failure of a law enforcement officer to 615 request the withdrawal of blood shall not affect the 616 admissibility of a test of blood withdrawn for medical purposes. 617 1.âNotwithstanding any provision of law pertaining to the 618 confidentiality of hospital records or other medical records, if 619 a health care provider, who is providing medical care in a 620 health care facility to a person injured in a motor vehicle 621 crash, becomes aware, as a result of any blood test performed in 622 the course of that medical treatment, that the personâs blood 623 alcohol level meets or exceeds the blood-alcohol level specified 624 in s. 316.193(1)(b), the health care provider may notify any law 625 enforcement officer or law enforcement agency. Any such notice 626 must be given within a reasonable time after the health care 627 provider receives the test result. Any such notice shall be used 628 only for the purpose of providing the law enforcement officer 629 with reasonable cause to request the withdrawal of a blood 630 sample pursuant to this section. 631 2.âThe notice shall consist only of the name of the person 632 being treated, the name of the person who drew the blood, the 633 blood-alcohol level indicated by the test, and the date and time 634 of the administration of the test. 635 3.âNothing contained in s. 395.3025(2) s. 395.3025(4), s. 636 456.057, or any applicable practice act affects the authority to 637 provide notice under this section, and the health care provider 638 is not considered to have breached any duty owed to the person 639 under s. 395.3025(2) s. 395.3025(4), s. 456.057, or any 640 applicable practice act by providing notice or failing to 641 provide notice. It shall not be a breach of any ethical, moral, 642 or legal duty for a health care provider to provide notice or 643 fail to provide notice. 644 4.âA civil, criminal, or administrative action may not be 645 brought against any person or health care provider participating 646 in good faith in the provision of notice or failure to provide 647 notice as provided in this section. Any person or health care 648 provider participating in the provision of notice or failure to 649 provide notice as provided in this section shall be immune from 650 any civil or criminal liability and from any professional 651 disciplinary action with respect to the provision of notice or 652 failure to provide notice under this section. Any such 653 participant has the same immunity with respect to participating 654 in any judicial proceedings resulting from the notice or failure 655 to provide notice. 656 Section 9.âSubsection (13) of section 395.4025, Florida 657 Statutes, is amended to read: 658 395.4025âTrauma centers; selection; quality assurance; 659 records.â 660 (13)âPatient care, transport, or treatment records or 661 reports, or patient care quality assurance proceedings, records, 662 or reports obtained or made pursuant to this section, s. 663 395.3025(2)(f) s. 395.3025(4)(f), s. 395.401, s. 395.4015, s. 664 395.402, s. 395.403, s. 395.404, s. 395.4045, s. 395.405, s. 665 395.50, or s. 395.51 must be held confidential by the department 666 or its agent and are exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1). 667 Patient care quality assurance proceedings, records, or reports 668 obtained or made pursuant to these sections are not subject to 669 discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil or 670 administrative action. 671 Section 10.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 672 397.702, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 673 397.702âAuthorization of local ordinances for treatment of 674 habitual abusers in licensed secure facilities.â 675 (2)âOrdinances for the treatment of habitual abusers must 676 provide: 677 (c)âThat the court with jurisdiction to make the 678 determination authorized by this section shall hear the petition 679 on an emergency basis as soon as practicable but not later than 680 10 days after the date the petition was filed. If the 681 allegations of the petition indicate that the respondent has 682 requested the appointment of an attorney, or otherwise indicate 683 the absence of any competent person to speak at the hearing on 684 behalf of the respondent, the court shall immediately appoint an 685 attorney to represent the respondent pursuant to s. 397.501(9) 686 s. 397.501(8), and shall provide notice of the hearing to the 687 attorney. When the court sets a hearing date the petitioner 688 shall provide notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition 689 to all of the persons named in the petition pursuant to 690 subparagraph (b)2., and to such other persons as may be ordered 691 by the court to receive notice. 692 Section 11.âSubsection (1) of section 429.294, Florida 693 Statutes, is amended to read: 694 429.294âAvailability of facility records for investigation 695 of residentâs rights violations and defenses; penalty.â 696 (1)âFailure to provide complete copies of a residentâs 697 records, including, but not limited to, all medical records and 698 the residentâs chart, within the control or possession of the 699 facility in accordance with s. 408.833 s. 400.145, shall 700 constitute evidence of failure of that party to comply with good 701 faith discovery requirements and shall waive the good faith 702 certificate and presuit notice requirements under this part by 703 the requesting party. 704 Section 12.âSubsection (4) of section 440.185, Florida 705 Statutes, is amended to read: 706 440.185âNotice of injury or death; reports; penalties for 707 violations.â 708 (4)âAdditional reports with respect to such injury and of 709 the condition of such employee, including copies of medical 710 reports, funeral expenses, and wage statements, shall be filed 711 by the employer or carrier to the department at such times and 712 in such manner as the department may prescribe by rule. In 713 carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter, the 714 department or agency may by rule provide for the obtaining of 715 any medical records relating to medical treatment provided 716 pursuant to this chapter, notwithstanding ss. 90.503 and 717 395.3025(2) the provisions of ss. 90.503 and 395.3025(4). 718 Section 13.âSubsection (3) of section 456.47, Florida 719 Statutes, is amended to read: 720 456.47âUse of telehealth to provide services.â 721 (3)âRECORDS.âA telehealth provider shall document in the 722 patientâs medical record the health care services rendered using 723 telehealth according to the same standard as used for in-person 724 services. Medical records, including video, audio, electronic, 725 or other records generated as a result of providing such 726 services, are confidential pursuant to ss. 395.3025(2) and 727 456.057 ss. 395.3025(4) and 456.057. 728 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.